Washington statutes.
RCW 24.60.080

Person responds without request or authorization.

The intrastate building safety mutual aid system does not provide rights or privileges to any person responding for any reason if a member jurisdiction has not requested or authorized that person to respond to the building safety emergency.

[ 2011 c 215 s 8.]